Louisiana, session 2026, SB518.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3351(A)(9) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3351. General powers, duties, and functions of postsecondary education
management boards
A. Subject only to the powers of the Board of Regents specifically
enumerated in Article VIII, Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and as
otherwise provided by law, each postsecondary system management board as a body
corporate shall have authority to exercise power necessary to supervise and manage
the day-to-day operations of institutions of postsecondary education under its
control, including but not limited to the following:
* * *
(9)(a) Sell, transfer, or exchange land or other property not needed for
university purposes, in accordance with law.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including those
in Title 39 and Title 41, the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State University
and Agricultural and Mechanical College, hereafter referred to as the "board",
shall have the authority to purchase, sell, transfer, or exchange immovable
property on behalf of Louisiana State University and Agricultural and
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 518 ENROLLED
Mechanical College, provided all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The property is entirely located within East Baton Rouge Parish.
(ii) The entirety of the property is not more than one mile from another
property owned by or under the administrative control of Louisiana State
University and Agricultural and Mechanical College.
(iii) For property being acquired, the purchase price or other
consideration for the property is not more than the appraised fair market value
of the property.
(iv) For property being alienated, the purchase price or other
consideration for the property is not less than the appraised fair market value
and the mineral rights are reserved for the state in accordance with Article IX,
Section 4 of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(v) The board shall provide to the state land office written notice of any
sale, transfer, or exchange performed under the provisions of this
Subparagraph within five business days of the transaction.
(vi) Any sale, transfer, or exchange performed with the approval of the
board and in accordance with, and prior to the effective date of, this
Subparagraph is hereby ratified.
(vii) The authority granted in this Subparagraph shall terminate on
August 1, 2028.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.